Idaho, session 2026, S1404.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Agriculture the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
AdministrationandAccountingServices
Fund $16,600 $29,800 $46,400
II. ANIMAL INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
AgriculturalFees-LivestockDiseaseControl
Fund $81,000 $81,000
AgriculturalFees-DairyInspection
Fund 30,000 30,000
Federal Grant
Fund 31,800 31,800
TOTAL $142,800 $142,800
III. AGRICULTURAL RESOURCES:
FROM:
Agricultural Fees - Pesticides
Fund $1,900 $13,300 $15,200


FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
IV. PLANT INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
Agricultural Inspection
Fund $35,000 $35,000
Invasive Species
Fund 238,400 238,400
AgriculturalFees-CommercialFeedandFertilizer
Fund 93,000 93,000
Agricultural Fees - Hemp
Fund 12,000 12,000
QualityAssuranceLaboratoryServices
Fund 9,500 9,500
Federal Grant
Fund 32,400 32,400
TOTAL $420,300 $420,300
V. AGRICULTURAL INSPECTIONS:
FROM:
Weights and Measures Inspection
Fund $31,100 $31,100
AgriculturalFees-OrganicFoodProducts
Fund 55,300 55,300
AgriculturalFees- FreshFruitandVegetableInspection
Fund 112,500 112,500
TOTAL $198,900 $198,900
VI. MARKET DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Agricultural Inspection
Fund $6,300 $6,300
GRAND TOTAL $18,500 $811,400 $829,900
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $1,298,600 from the General Fund to the Pest Control
Deficiency Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026. Such moneys shall be used to reimburse costs incurred by the


Plant Industries Program in the Department of Agriculture pursuant to Sec-
tion 22-2019, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 97, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Department of Agriculture for the Plant Indus-
tries Program the following amounts to be expended according to the desig-
nated expense classes from the Invasive Species Fund for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $27,000
Operating Expenditures 3,345,500
Capital Outlay 20,500
TOTAL $3,393,000
SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE FEDERAL GRANT FUND. There
is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Agriculture any unexpended and
unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department of
Agriculture for the Resilient Food Systems Infrastructure Grant in fiscal
year 2026, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2027. The Department of Agriculture shall confirm the
reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program with the Leg-
islative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized
herein.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 2 and 3 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 and 4 of this act shall
be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.